Illinois, session 104th, SB1097.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Historic Preservation Tax Credit Act is 5amended by changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (35 ILCS 31/1)7    Sec. 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the the 8Historic Preservation Tax Credit Act.9(Source: P.A. 100-629, eff. 1-1-19.)